zh-TW: 釘書針線規: 細; 重型; 媒介; 其他
sk-SK: Rozmer zošívacieho drôtu: Jemný; Ťažký; Stredný; Iné
en: Staple wire gauge: Fine; Heavy; Medium; Other
fr: Jauge de fil d’agrafe: Fin; Lourd; Moyen; Autre
da: Hæftetrådmåler: Fin; Tung; Medium; Andet
sv: Tjocklek på häfttråd: Fint; Tung; Medium; Övrigt
nb: Stifttrådmåler: Tynn; Tung; Middels; Annet
it: Spessore del filo della graffetta: Fine; Pesante; Medio; Altro
ko: 스테이플러 심 게이지: 파인; 무거움; 매체; 기타
th: เกจวัดลวดเย็บกระดาษ: บาง; ตึงมาก; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 订书钉线规: 细; 重; 媒介; 其他
pt-PT: Calibre de fio de agrafo: Fina; Elevada; Médio; Outro
ru: Калибр проволоки для скоб: Тонкий; Тяжелый; Средний; Другой
de: Heftdrahtstärke: Fein; Schwer; Medium; Sonstiges
tr: Zımba teli göstergesi: İnce; Ağır; Orta; Diğer
el: Μετρητής συρραπτικού σύρματος: Λεπτές; Μεγάλη; Μέση; Άλλο
hu: Tűzőkapocsdrót mérete: Finom; Nehéz; Közepes; Egyéb
lt-LT: Sankabėlių dydis: Smulkus; Didelis; Vidutinis; Kita
es: Calibre del alambre de grapas: Fino; Pesado; Medio; Otros
vi: Máy đo dây ghim: Mảnh; Nặng; Vừa; Khác
ja: ホッチキス針の太さ: ファイン; 重い; 媒体; その他
pl: Wielkość zszywki: Dobre; Ciężki; Środek; Inne
bg-BG: Размер на тел за телбод: Фина; Тежка; Средна; Други
nl: Nietje draadmeter: Fijn; Zwaar; Medium; Andere
ro-RO: Grosimea sârmei pentru capse: Subțire; Groasă; Medie; Altele
pt-BR: Tamanho do grampo: Ralo; Pesado; Médio; Outro
sl-SI: Debelina žice za sponke: Fino; Močna; Srednja; Drugo
cs: Rozměr sponkovacího drátu: Jemný; Těžká; Médium; Jiné
fi: Niittilangan mittari: Ohut; Raskas; Keskimääräinen; Muu
hr-HR: Punjenje za klamericu: Tanko; Široko; Srednje; Ostalo